Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-930
County board; enjoin or restrain; when.

Sections 31-901 to 31-933 shall not prevent any lot or land owner from enjoining or restraining the board from cleaning or other actions under section 31-922 when it can be proven that such action by the board will damage such owner and no provision for reimbursement therefor has been provided, either by making said owner party to said project in the manner provided in section 31-909 or otherwise.

Laws 1959, c. 132, § 30, p. 493.